Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-429
Lottery or raffle; gross proceeds; tax; deficiencies.

Any licensed organization or any other organization conducting a lottery or raffle activity required to be licensed pursuant to the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act shall pay to the department a tax of two percent of the gross proceeds of each lottery or raffle having gross proceeds greater than fifteen thousand dollars. Such tax shall be remitted annually by September 30 each year on forms approved and provided by the department. The department shall remit the tax to the State Treasurer for credit to the Charitable Gaming Operations Fund. All deficiencies of the tax imposed by this section shall accrue interest and be subject to a penalty as provided for sales and use taxes in the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.

Laws 1983, LB 259, § 61;

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 70;

R.S.Supp.,1984, § 9-196;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 150;

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 51;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 107;

Laws 2020, LB1056, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB1204, § 5.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.